src-fst-morphology-affixes-adjectives.lexc.md
* Adjectives 12 examples:*
* *harmaja:* `harmaja+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # ?)
* *harmajaa:* `harmaja+A+Sg+Par`
* *harmajana:* `harmaja+A+Sg+Ess`
* *harmajoina:* `harmaja+A+Pl+Ess`
* *harmajoita:* `harmaja+A+Pl+Par`

Certain trisyllabic or longer a stems allow a lot of allomorphs and both
a : o : 0 variations:

* Adjectives 12++ examples:*
* *latuska:* `latuska+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # flat)
* *latuskoita:* `latuska+A+Pl+Par`
* *latuskoja:* `latuska+A+Pl+Par`
* *latuskoiden:* `latuska+A+Pl+Gen`
* *latuskoitten:* `latuska+A+Pl+Gen`
* *latuskojen:* `latuska+A+Pl+Gen`
* *latuskoihin:* `latuska+A+Pl+Ill`

### Special illative gradation in a stems

The a : o stem variation combines with trisyllabic class of special illatives

* Adjectives 14 back examples:*
* *hailakka:* `hailakka+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # pale)
* *hailakkoina:* `hailakka+A+Pl+Ess`
* *hailakoissa:* `hailakka+A+Pl+Ine`
* *hailakkoihin:* `hailakka+A+Pl+Ill`
* *hailakoihin:* `hailakka+A+Pl+Ill`

* Adjectives 14 front examples:*
* *räväkkä:* `räväkkä+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # flamboyant)
* *räväköihin:* `räväkkä+A+Pl+Ill`
* *räväkköihin:* `räväkkä+A+Pl+Ill`

* Adjectives 15 t~0 back examples:*
* *pohatta:* `pohatta+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # fat-cat)
* *pohattoina:* `pohatta+A+Pl+Ess`
* *pohatoissa:* `pohatta+A+Pl+Ine`
* *pohattoihin:* `pohatta+A+Pl+Ill`
* *pohatoihin:* `pohatta+A+Pl+Ill`

A-final words with long vowels and syllable boundary

* Adjectives 15 oa examples:*
* *ainoa:* `ainoa+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # singleton)
* *ainoana:* `ainoa+A+Sg+Ess`
* *ainoina:* `ainoa+A+Pl+Ess`
* *ainoissa:* `ainoa+A+Pl+Ine`
* *ainoihin:* `ainoa+A+Pl+Ill`
* *ainoisiin:* `ainoa+A+Pl+Ill`

* Adjectives 15 ea examples:*
* *korkea:* `korkea+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # high)
* *korkeana:* `korkea+A+Sg+Ess`
* *korkeina:* `korkea+A+Pl+Ess`
* *korkeissa:* `korkea+A+Pl+Ine`
* *korkeihin:* `korkea+A+Pl+Ill`
* *korkeisiin:* `korkea+A+Pl+Ill`

* Adjectives 15 eä examples:*
* *järeä:* `järeä+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # rough)
* *järeänä:* `järeä+A+Sg+Ess`
* *järeinä:* `järeä+A+Pl+Ess`
* *järeissä:* `järeä+A+Pl+Ine`
* *järeihin:* `järeä+A+Pl+Ill`
* *järeisiin:* `järeä+A+Pl+Ill`

### Lexicalised comparatives
Most of the lexicalised comparatives are adjectives that go to this class.
The comparatives that are not lexicalised inflect exactly the same, though
some versions of morphology may cut off long comparative chains.

* Adjectives 16 back examples:*
* *aiempi:* `aiempi+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # earlier)
* *aiempana:* `aiempi+A+Sg+Ess`
* *aiemmassa:* `aiempi+A+Sg+Ine`
* *aiempina:* `aiempi+A+Pl+Ess`
* *aiemmista:* `aiempi+A+Pl+Ela`

* Adjectives 16 front examples:*
* *lähempi:* `lähempi+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # closer)
* *lähempänä:* `lähempi+A+Sg+Ess`
* *lähemmässä:* `lähempi+A+Sg+Ine`
* *lähempinä:* `lähempi+A+Pl+Ess`
* *lähemmistä:* `lähempi+A+Pl+Ela`

### Long vowel stems

* Adjectives 17 a examples:*
* *vapaa:* `vapaa+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # free)

There are no other bisyllabic long vowel stems in adjectives

* Adjectives 18 aa examples:*
* *peeaa:* `peeaa+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # bust)

* Adjectives 18 uu examples:*
* *muu:* `muu+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # other)

* Adjectives 18 ää examples:*
* *syypää:* `syypää+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # guilty)

There are no other monosyllabic long vowel stems for adjectives. For full
listing of possibilities, see nouns.

Some loan words inflect irregularly, either more along the written form or
the pronunciation. 

* Adjectives 21 gay examples:*
* *gay:* `gay+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # gay)

There are not many direct adjective loans in general.

### Old e stems with i nominative
Some of the old e stems have i nominative but e as stem vowel for singular
forms. Most of these are not adjectives though, see full listing from the
noun pages.

* Adjectives 24~26 back examples:*
* *suuri:* `suuri+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # big)
THE EPSILON-to-ZILCH SEEMS TO INTERFER WITH COMPILATION 2015-08-23, Jaska
0:  >> 0:0 SO TOMMI FINDS THEM

* Adjectives 24~26 front examples:*
* *pieni:* `pieni+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # small)

* Adjectives 27 back examples:*
* *uusi:* `uusi+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # new)

* Adjectives 27 front examples:*
* *täysi:* `täysi+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # full)

There are no adjective examples of other gradation variants or consonant
cluster simplifications in this class.

### Consonant-final stems
The consonant stems use inverted gradation if applicable, that is, the 
nominatives have end in consonants and their gradating consonants are in
weak form. Most of these are rarer for adjectives than nouns.

* Adjectives 32 examples:*
* *tyven:* `tyven+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # calm (of bodies of water))

There are no back vowel variants or gradating words in the basic e
conjoining pattern.

* Adjectives 33 examples:*
* *avoin:* `avoin+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # open)

There are no other examples of n:m final variation before conjoining e.

### Caritives
The common case of n:m variation with conjoining a before singular stems is
from caritive suffix -tOn, that forms adjectives productively. 

* Adjectives 34 back examples:*
* *alaston:* `alaston+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # naked)

* Adjectives 34 0~t back examples:*
* *viaton:* `viaton+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # innocent)

* Adjectives 34 0~t front examples:*
* *kyvytön:* `kyvytön+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # unskilled)

This one word, hapan, also takes the same variation as normative variant.
The expected e variant is not normative, but used.

* Adjectives 34 0~p back examples:*
* *hapan:* `hapan+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # sour)

* Adjectives 34 m~p front examples:*
* *lämmin:* `lämmin+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # warm)

### Lexicalised superlatives

* Adjectives 35 back examples:*
* *uloin:* `uloin+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # outermost)

* Adjectives 35 front examples:*
* *sisin:* `sisin+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # innermost)

Vasen inflects almost like superlative

* Adjectives 36 examples:*
* *vasen:* `vasen+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # left)

### nen suffixes
Adjectives are commonly formed with nen derivatonns.

* Adjectives 38 back examples:*
* *aakkosellinen:* `aakkosellinen+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # alphabetic)

* Adjectives 38 front examples:*
* *kylmäjärkinen:* `kylmäjärkinen+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # levelminded)

### s-final adjectives

Most of the cases here are nouns from noun derivations.

* Adjectives 39 examples:*
* *symppis:* `symppis+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # sympathetic)

* Adjectives 40 examples:*
* *lähteisyys:* `lähteisyys+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # sourceful)

* Adjectives 41 as examples:*
* *autuas:* `autuas+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # ignorant)

* Adjectives 41 is examples:*
* *valmis:* `valmis+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # ready)

* Adjectives 41 äs examples:*
* *työläs:* `työläs+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # studious)

* Adjectives 41 kas examples:*
* *voimakas:* `voimakas+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # powerfui)

* Adjectives 41 käs examples:*
* *tyylikäs:* `tyylikäs+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # stylish)

* Adjectives 41 pas examples:*
* *reipas:* `reipas+A+Sg+Nom`

No adjectives end in -päs

* Adjectives 41 tas examples:*
* *rietas:* `rietas+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # lewd)

* Adjectives 41 tis examples:*
* *raitis:* `raitis+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # sober)

Gaps.

* Adjectives 41 das examples:*
* *hidas:* `hidas+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # slow)

Gaps

* Adjectives 41 ras examples:*
* *harras:* `harras+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # humble)

### t-finals

* Adjectives 43 back examples:*
* *ohut:* `ohut+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # thin)

* Adjectives 43 front examples:*
* *ehyt:* `ehyt+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # unbroken)

### Lexicalised nut-participles
Majority of lexicalised nut participles are adjectives.

* Adjectives 47 back examples:*
* *kulunut:* `kulunut+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # used)

* Adjectives 47 front examples:*
* *ällistynyt:* `ällistynyt+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # amazed)

### Old -e^ final stems

* Adjectives 48 back examples:*
* *ahne:* `ahne+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # greedy)

* Adjectives 48 front examples:*
* *terve:* `terve+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # healthy)

* Adjectives 48 d~t back examples:*
* *kade:* `kade+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # jealous)

* Adjectives 48 l~t back examples:*
* *helle:* `helle+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # warm weather)

Gapping almost all variants of gradations with e, as well as all dual
nominative stems.

### Exceptional adjectives
The ones that do not fit in the official classes shown in dictionaries.

* Adjective pitkä examples:*
* *pitkä:* `pitkä+A+Sg+Nom`
* *pidempi:* `pitkä+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *pisin:* `pitkä+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

THE EPSILON-to-ZILCH SEEMS TO INTERFER WITH COMPILATION 2015-08-23, Jaska
0:  >> 0:0 SO TOMMI FINDS THEM

THE EPSILON-to-ZILCH SEEMS TO INTERFER WITH COMPILATION 2015-08-23, Jaska
0:  >> 0:0 SO TOMMI FINDS THEM

### Plurales tantum?
Adjectives aren't typically plural words, but there are some in the
dictionaries.

* Adjective plurales examples:*
* *leuattomat:* `leuattomat+A+Pl+Nom` (Eng. # ?)

## Adjective inflection proper

The superlative derivation is formed by in suffix, which creates a new
adjective baseform. This baseform is handled separately to avoid double
superlatives.

* Adjective superlative front examples:*
* *rumin:* `ruma+A+Superl+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # ugliest)

* Adjective superlative back examples:*
* *tyhmin:* `tyhmä+A+Superl+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # stupidest)

The comparative derivation is formed by mpi suffix, which creates a new
adjective baseform. This adjective is handled separately
to avoid double comparative forms.

* Adjective comparative front examples:*
* *rumempi:* `ruma+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`

* Adjective comparative back examples:*
* *tyhmempi:* `tyhmä+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`

This inflectional part attached to adjective comparative stems to avoid
circularity in comparative derivations:

* Adjective comparative inflection back examples:*
* *nopeampi:* `nopea+A+Comp+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # faster)
* ★*nopeammampi:* `nopea+A+Comp+Comp+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)
* ★*nopeammammampi:* `nopea+A+Comp+Comp+Comp+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)

* Adjective comparative inflection front examples:*
* *tyhmempänä:* `tyhmä+A+Comp+Sg+Ess`
* ★*tyhmemmämpi:* `tyhmä+A+Comp+Comp+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)

This inflectional part is attached to adjective superlative stems to avoid
circularity in superlative  derivations:

* Adjective superlative inflection back examples:*
* *nopein:* `nopea+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`
* ★*nopeimmimpia:* `nopea+A+Superl+Superl+Sg+Par` (is not standard language)
* ★*nopeimmimmin:* `nopea+A+Superl+Superl+Superl+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)

* Adjective superlative inflection front examples:*
* *tyhmin:* `tyhmä+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`
* ★*tyhmimmimpiä:* `tyhmä+A+Superl+Superl+Sg+Par` (is not standard language)

## Regular adjective inflection
The adjective inflection apart from the comparative and superlative
derivations is same as with nouns. I will only show examples here.

* Adjective nominative back examples:*
* *rumapa:* `ruma+A+Sg+Nom+Foc/pa`

* Adjective nominative front examples:*
* *tyhmäpä:* `tyhmä+A+Sg+Nom+Foc/pa`

* Adjective pl tant back examples:*
* *rumat:* `ruma+A+Pl+Nom`

* Adjective pl tant front examples:*
* *tyhmät:* `tyhmä+A+Pl+Nom`

* Adjective regular singular back examples:*
* *ruman:* `ruma+A+Sg+Gen`
* *rumatta:* `ruma+A+Sg+Abe`

* Adjective regular singular front examples:*
* *tyhmän:* `tyhmä+A+Sg+Gen`
* *tyhmättä:* `tyhmä+A+Sg+Abe`

* Adjective regular singular back strongs examples:*
* *rumana:* `ruma+A+Sg+Ess`
* *rumani:* `ruma+A+Sg+Nom+PxSg1`

* Adjective regular singular front strongs examples:*
* *tyhmänä:* `tyhmä+A+Sg+Ess`
* *tyhmäni:* `tyhmä+A+Sg+Nom+PxSg1`

* Adjective regular plural back examples:*
* *heikoitta:* `heikko+A+Pl+Abe`
* *heikoilta:* `heikko+A+Pl+Abl`

* Adjective regular plural front examples:*
* *jäykittä:* `jäykkä+A+Pl+Abe`
* *jäykiltä:* `jäykkä+A+Pl+Abl`

* Adjective regular plural back strong examples:*
* *jäykkinä:* `jäykkä+A+Pl+Ess`
* *jäykkine:* `jäykkä+A+Cmt`

* Adjective regular plural front strong examples:*
* *heikkoina:* `heikko+A+Pl+Ess`
* *heikkoine:* `heikko+A+Cmt`

* Adjective singular partitive a examples:*
* *tarkkaa:* `tarkka+A+Sg+Par`
* *tarkkaansa:* `tarkka+A+Sg+Par+PxSg3`

* Adjective singular partitive ä examples:*
* *tyhmää:* `tyhmä+A+Sg+Par`
* *tyhmäänsä:* `tyhmä+A+Sg+Par+PxSg3`

* Adjective singular partitive a poss aan examples:*
* *jaloa:* `jalo+A+Sg+Par`
* *jaloaan:* `jalo+A+Sg+Par+PxSg3`
